Hawaii statutes.
[§321-422] Birth defects program. The
department of health shall establish the statewide birth defects program to:

(1) Collect surveillance information on birth defects
and other adverse reproductive outcomes;

(2) Report the incidence, trends, and causes of birth defects and other
adverse reproductive outcomes;

(3) Report information for
the development of prevention strategies to reduce the incidence of birth
defects and other adverse reproductive outcomes; and

(4) Develop strategies to
improve the access of children with birth
defects to health and early intervention services. [L 2002, c 252, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next